Indiana, session 2026, SB195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-14-30-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.207-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The division shall notify the United States
Department of Agriculture and take any other action necessary for the
state to:
(1) elect to participate in; and
(2) implement, beginning January 1, 2018;
expanded categorical eligibility within SNAP.
(b) The division shall implement for the expanded categorical
eligibility a countable asset limitation for resources that does not
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). In determining whether an
individual meets the resource requirement of this subsection, an
individual's funeral and burial resources, including both revocable and
irrevocable resources, may not be counted.
(c) (b) The division may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary to
implement this section.
(d) (c) Before November 1, 2018, the division shall submit a report
2026 IN 195—LS 6362/DI 119


in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6 to the legislative council
concerning the projected total amounts that individuals receiving
SNAP benefits would be required to repay over the period beginning
January 1, 2018, and ending December 31, 2019, due to positive errors,
in which individuals are approved for an amount in error and then are
required to repay the amount. The projected total amounts must be
based on the amounts that individuals receiving SNAP benefits have
been required to repay over the period beginning January 1, 2018, and
ending September 30, 2018, due to positive errors.
2026 IN 195—LS 6362/DI 119